Wisconsin, session 2025, SB44.
do enact as follows:SB44,12Section 1. 66.0443 of the statutes is created to read:SB44,1,3366.0443 Local regulation of fowl. (1) In this section:SB44,2,11(a) “Fowl” means chickens or quail.SB44,2,32(b) “Local governmental unit” means a city, village, town, county, or sewerage 3district.SB44,2,54(2) No local governmental unit may prohibit the keeping of 4 or fewer fowl by 5any of the following on a property zoned for residential use:SB44,2,86(a) The owner of the property. A local governmental unit may prohibit any 7keeping of fowl that is inconsistent with the condominium’s declarations, bylaws, 8and rules on a property that is a condominium.SB44,2,99(b) A lessor of the property if the property is owner-occupied.SB44,2,1110(3) Notwithstanding sub. (2), a local governmental unit may do any of the 11following with regard to the keeping of fowl:SB44,2,1212(a) Require a keeper of fowl to obtain a permit.SB44,2,1413(b) Require notification of owners of properties adjoining the property on 14which fowl are to be kept.SB44,2,1615(c) Impose reasonable regulations related to the location of fowl housing on a 16property.SB44,2,1717(d) Prohibit the keeping of roosters.SB44,2,1818(e) Impose reasonable cleanliness standards.SB44,2,1919